New Jersey, session 221, A2110.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1948, c.28 (C.39:3-27.1) is amended to read as follows: [No]   1.   a.   A fee shall not be charged for the registration, in any year or years, of one motor vehicle of passenger type, which is not to be used for hire, owned by any resident of the State of New Jersey, individually or jointly with a spouse[;] , who: (1)   [who] is eligible for compensation pursuant to R.S. 38:18-1, R.S.38:18-2, and R.S.38:18-3[,] ; (2)   [who] has qualified or shall qualify under the provisions of Public Law 663-79th Congress of the United States of America (August 8, 1946) or of Public  Law 187--82nd Congress of the United States of America (October 20, 1951) or who is a veteran of World War I with service-connected disabilities of the kind set forth in [said] those Public Laws, and who is the holder of a current driver's license issued by this State, if such motor vehicle is equipped with such special attachments and devices as the [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles in the Department of Law and Public Safety] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may deem necessary to provide for the safe operation thereof by such person[, or] ; (3)   [who] is the holder of the Congressional Medal of Honor, which registration shall be evidenced by distinctive license plates of a design approved by the [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles] chief administrator; or (4)   has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States who is adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, as being permanently 100 percent disabled. b.    The Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, in consultation with the chief administrator, shall notify all eligible motorists of the availability of the fee exemption provided for pursuant to subsection a. of this section. (cf: P.L.1979, c.122, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the thirteenth month after enactment, but the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs and the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may take such administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.